apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="diacakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbaiki__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbaikinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbanyaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak-acaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormat-hormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormat-hormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dihormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baiknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baik-baik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baik-baiknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sebaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="se"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan-keberjayaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan-keberjayaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepengecutan-kepengecutan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepengecutan-kepengecutannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepengecutan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepengecutannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian-keabadian__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian-keabadiannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan-keseimbangan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan-keseimbangannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadiannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan-keterlambatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan-keterlambatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman-pedalaman__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalaman-pedalamannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="benar"><p><l>benar-benar</l><r>benar</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="betul"><p><l>betul-betul</l><r>betul</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gila"><p><l>gila-gila</l><r>gila</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ragu"><p><l>ragu-ragu</l><r>ragu</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rata"><p><l>rata-rata</l><r>rata</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tiap"><p><l>tiap-tiap</l><r>tiap</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tua"><p><l>tua-tua</l><r>tua</r></p><par n="baik-baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tebal"><p><l>tebalnya</l><r>tebal</r></p><par n="baiknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sayang"><p><l>disayangkan</l><r>sayang</r></p><par n="diacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tawar"><p><l>ditawarkan</l><r>tawar</r></p><par n="diacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="giat"><p><l>kegiatan-kegiatan</l><r>giat</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mudah"><p><l>kemudahan-kemudahan</l><r>mudah</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penting"><p><l>kepentingan-kepentingan</l><r>penting</r></p><par n="keabadian-keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bebas"><p><l>kebebasan</l><r>bebas</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biasa"><p><l>kebiasaan</l><r>biasa</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dalam"><p><l>kedalaman</l><r>dalam</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jelas"><p><l>kejelasan</l><r>jelas</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="laju"><p><l>kelajuan</l><r>laju</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marah"><p><l>kemarahan</l><r>marah</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="patuh"><p><l>kepatuhan</l><r>patuh</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sakti"><p><l>kesaktian</l><r>sakti</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stabil"><p><l>kestabilan</l><r>stabil</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terang"><p><l>keterangan</l><r>terang</r></p><par n="keabadian__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biasa"><p><l>kebiasaannya</l><r>biasa</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cerdas"><p><l>kecerdasannya</l><r>cerdas</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>kedekatannya</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="giat"><p><l>kegiatannya</l><r>giat</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaya"><p><l>kekayaannya</l><r>kaya</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="laju"><p><l>kelajuannya</l><r>laju</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemah"><p><l>kelemahannya</l><r>lemah</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marah"><p><l>kemarahannya</l><r>marah</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="salah"><p><l>kesalahannya</l><r>salah</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sihat"><p><l>kesihatannya</l><r>sihat</r></p><par n="keabadiannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sama"><p><l>kebersamaan</l><r>sama</r></p><par n="keberjayaan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>keseimbangan</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="keseimbangan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="labuh"><p><l>pelabuhan-pelabuhan</l><r>labuh</r></p><par n="pedalaman-pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="banyak"><p><l>sebanyak</l><r>banyak</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bati"><p><l>sebati</l><r>bati</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="genap"><p><l>segenap</l><r>genap</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>seimbang</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jati"><p><l>sejati</l><r>jati</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jauh"><p><l>sejauh</l><r>jauh</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lebar"><p><l>selebar</l><r>lebar</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="panjang"><p><l>sepanjang</l><r>panjang</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ramai"><p><l>seramai</l><r>ramai</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sama"><p><l>sesama</l><r>sama</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tiap"><p><l>setiap</l><r>tiap</r></p><par n="sebaik__adj"/></e>
